langs/1/morphology.twol
Alphabet
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
 %{Tf%}:0
 %{Tm%}:0
 %{Tn%}:0
 %{Tp%}:0
 %{Vi%}:i
 %{Vol%}:ol ;

Sets

FinalCons = t k m n c ;

Rules

"Far-past tense"
VMP:Vx <=> _ :FinalCons %{Tf%}: ; where VMP in (%{Vi%} %{Vol%}) Vx in (ul uh) matched ;
"Mid-past tense"
VMP:Vx <=> _ :FinalCons %{Tm%}: ; where VMP in (%{Vi%} %{Vol%}) Vx in (a y) matched ;
"Near-past tense"
VMP:Vx <=> _ :FinalCons %{Tn%}: ; where VMP in (%{Vi%} %{Vol%}) Vx in (e el) matched ;
"Non-past tense"
VMP:Vx <=> _ :FinalCons %{Tp%}: ; where VMP in (%{Vi%} %{Vol%}) Vx in (i ol) matched ;
